Maryland, session 2026, HB0066.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
10–802.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(2) continued exclusive reliance on traditional forms of electricity supply
entrenches the State’s dependence on fossil fuels, working against the State’s policy of
decreasing greenhouse gas production[, as evidenced by the State’s accession to the
Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative];
Article – Environment
2–1002.
[(g) (1) In this subsection, “allowance” means one ton of carbon dioxide that
may be bought, sold, traded, or banked for use under the Regional Greenhouse Gas
Initiative.
(2) Not later than June 30, 2007, the Governor shall include the State as a
full participant in the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative among Mid–Atlantic and
Northeast states.

HOUSE BILL 66 3
(3) The State may withdraw from the Initiative, as provided in the
December 20, 2005 memorandum of understanding of the Initiative, at any time after
January 1, 2009, if the General Assembly enacts a law to approve the withdrawal.
(4) If the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative expires and there is a
successor organization with the same purposes and goals, the Governor is encouraged to
join the State in the successor organization.
(5) Notwithstanding § 2–107 of this title, all of the proceeds from the sale
of Maryland allowances under the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative shall be deposited
in the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund under § 9–20B–05 of the State
Government Article.
(6) If the State’s participation in the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative
ceases for any reason, the Governor shall report to the General Assembly, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, regarding:
(i) Why participation ceased; and
(ii) A plan to reduce carbon dioxide emissions from power plants in
the State that considers the use of Maryland grown, native, warm season grasses as a
possible method of reducing carbon emissions.]
2–1205.
(g) (2) (i) Unless required by federal law or regulations or existing State
law, regulations adopted by State agencies to implement a final plan may not:
1. Require any manufacturer to reduce greenhouse gas
emissions below the emissions levels for that manufacturer in 2023;
2. Cause an increase in costs to a manufacturer that are
significantly beyond the costs that were incurred by that manufacturer in 2023; or
3. Require any manufacturer that is engaged in the creation
of renewable energy components or technology aimed at greenhouse gas emissions
reductions to reduce greenhouse gas emissions.
(ii) Subparagraph (i) of this paragraph may not be construed to
exempt greenhouse gas emissions sources in the State’s manufacturing sector from the
obligation to comply with[:
1. Greenhouse] GREENHOUSE gas emissions monitoring,
recordkeeping, and reporting requirements for which the Department had existing
authority under § 2–301(a) of this title on or before October 1, 2009[; or

HOUSE BILL 66
2. Greenhouse gas emissions reductions required of the
manufacturing sector as a result of the State’s implementation of the Regional Greenhouse
Gas Initiative].
Article – Natural Resources
5–307.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Mel Noland Woodland Incentives and
Fellowship Fund.
(g) The Department shall use the Fund:
(7) To provide financial assistance, as provided in the State budget, for the
administration of an urban and community forestry program established under § 5–426 of
this title, including:
(i) Increasing the number of communities with tree canopy goals;
(ii) Facilitating compliance with the Chesapeake Bay Program’s
forestry targets; AND
(iii) Supporting the use of urban tree canopy expansion for air quality
improvement purposes; [and
(iv) Helping achieve implementation of Regional Greenhouse Gas
Initiative offset opportunities in urban areas;]
Article – State Government
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.
(b) The purpose of the Fund is to implement the Strategic Energy Investment
Program.
(c) The Administration shall administer the Fund.
(d) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately and the Comptroller shall
account for the Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:

HOUSE BILL 66 5
(1) [all of the proceeds from the sale of allowances under § 2–1002(g) of the
Environment Article;
(2)] money appropriated in the State budget to the Program;
[(3)] (2) repayments and prepayments of principal and interest on loans
made from the Fund;
[(4)] (3) compliance fees paid under § 7–705 of the Public Utilities Article;
[(5)] (4) money received from any public or private source for the benefit
of the Fund;
[(6)] (5) money transferred from the Public Service Commission under §
7–207.2(d)(3) of the Public Utilities Article; and
[(7)] (6) money distributed under § 2–614.1 of the Tax – General Article.
(f) The Administration shall use the Fund:
(1) to invest in the promotion, development, and implementation of:
(i) cost–effective energy efficiency and conservation programs,
projects, or activities, including measurement and verification of energy savings;
(ii) renewable and clean energy resources;
(iii) climate change programs directly related to reducing or
mitigating the effects of climate change; and
(iv) demand response programs that are designed to promote
changes in electric usage by customers in response to:
1. changes in the price of electricity over time; or
2. incentives designed to induce lower electricity use at times
of high wholesale market prices or when system reliability is jeopardized;
(2) to provide targeted programs, projects, activities, and investments to
reduce electricity consumption by customers in the low–income and moderate–income
residential sectors;
(3) to provide supplemental funds for low–income energy assistance
through the Electric Universal Service Program established under § 7–512.1 of the Public
Utilities Article and other electric assistance programs in the Department of Human
Services;

HOUSE BILL 66
(4) to provide rate relief by offsetting electricity rates of residential
customers, including an offset of surcharges imposed on ratepayers under Title 7, Subtitle
2, Part II of the Public Utilities Article;
(5) to provide grants, loans, and other assistance and investment as
necessary and appropriate to implement the purposes of the Program as set forth in §
9–20B–03 of this subtitle;
(6) to implement energy–related public education and outreach initiatives
regarding reducing energy consumption and greenhouse gas emissions;
(7) to provide rebates under the Electric Vehicle Recharging Equipment
Rebate Program established under § 9–2009 of this title;
(8) to provide grants to encourage combined heat and power projects at
industrial facilities;
(9) to provide at least $1,200,000 in each fiscal year for fiscal year 2025
through fiscal year 2028 to the Climate Technology Founder’s Fund established under §
10–858 of the Economic Development Article;
(10) subject to subsection (f–2) of this section, to provide at least $2,100,000
in funding each fiscal year to the Maryland Energy Innovation Fund established under §
10–835 of the Economic Development Article;
(11) to provide at least $500,000 each year to the Resiliency Hub Grant
Program Fund under § 9–2011 of this title;
(12) to provide grants through the Customer–Sited Solar Program under §
9–2016 of this title;
(13) [notwithstanding subsection (g) of this section,] to pay costs associated
with the Air and Radiation Administration within the Department of the Environment; and
(14) to pay the expenses of the Program.
(f–1) (1) Any funding provided under subsection (f)(9) of this section that is not
spent in a given fiscal year shall revert to the Fund in the following fiscal year.
(2) The Administration may provide additional funding for the purposes
stated in subsection (f)(9) of this section.
(f–2) Of the funds transferred to the Maryland Energy Innovation Fund under
subsection (f)(10) of this section:

HOUSE BILL 66 7
(1) at least $1,200,000 may be used to fund the Maryland Clean Energy
Center established under § 10–806 of the Economic Development Article; and
(2) at least $900,000 may be used to fund the Maryland Energy Innovation
Institute established under § 10–829 of the Economic Development Article.
[(g) Proceeds received by the Fund from the sale of allowances under § 2–1002(g)
of the Environment Article shall be allocated as follows:
(1) at least 50% shall be credited to an energy assistance account to be used
for the Electric Universal Service Program and other electricity assistance programs in the
Department of Human Services;
(2) at least 20% shall be credited to a low and moderate income efficiency
and conservation programs account and to a general efficiency and conservation programs
account for energy efficiency and conservation programs, projects, or activities and demand
response programs, of which at least one–half shall be targeted to the low and moderate
income efficiency and conservation programs account for:
(i) the low–income residential sector at no cost to the participants
of the programs, projects, or activities; and
(ii) the moderate–income residential sector;
(3) at least 20% shall be credited to a renewable and clean energy programs
account for:
(i) renewable and clean energy programs and initiatives;
(ii) energy–related public education and outreach; and
(iii) climate change and resiliency programs; and
(4) up to 10%, but not more than $7,500,000, shall be credited to an
administrative expense account for costs related to the administration of the Fund,
including the review of electric company plans for achieving electricity savings and demand
reductions that the electric companies are required under law to submit to the
Administration.]
[(g–1)] (G) Proceeds received by the Fund from compliance fees under §
7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of the Public Utilities Article shall be allocated as follows:
(1) beginning in fiscal year 2025, at least 20% of the proceeds shall be used
to provide grants to support the installation of new solar energy generating systems under
the Customer–Sited Solar Program;

HOUSE BILL 66
(2) up to 10% of the proceeds shall be credited to an administrative expense
account for costs related to the administration of the Fund;
(3) proceeds collected but unused from a previous year shall be used before
proceeds allocated for the current year; and
(4) the Administration shall reallocate to other authorized uses any
proceeds that are not used within 3 fiscal years after collection.
[(h) (1) Energy efficiency and conservation programs under subsection (g)(2) of
this section include:
(i) low–income energy efficiency programs;
(ii) residential and small business energy efficiency programs;
(iii) commercial and industrial energy efficiency programs;
(iv) State and local energy efficiency programs;
(v) demand response programs;
(vi) loan programs and alternative financing mechanisms; and
(vii) grants to training funds and other organizations supporting job
training for deployment of energy efficiency and energy conservation technology and
equipment.
(2) Energy–related public education and outreach and renewable and clean
energy programs and initiatives under subsection (g)(3)(i) and (ii) of this section include:
(i) production incentives for specified renewable energy sources;
(ii) expansion of existing grant programs for solar, geothermal, and
wind programs;
(iii) loan programs and alternative financing mechanisms; and
(iv) consumer education and outreach programs that are designed to
reach low–income communities.]
[(i)] (H) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of this
subsection, compliance fees paid under § 7–705(b) of the Public Utilities Article may be
used only to make loans and grants to support the creation of new Tier 1 renewable energy
sources in the State that are owned by or directly benefit:

HOUSE BILL 66 9
(i) low– to moderate–income communities located in a census tract
with an average median income at or below 80% of the average median income for the State;
or
(ii) overburdened or underserved communities, as defined in § 1–701
of the Environment Article.
(2) Compliance fees paid under § 7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of the Public Utilities
Article shall be accounted for separately within the Fund and may be used only to make
loans and grants to support the creation of new solar energy sources in the State that are
owned by or directly benefit:
(i) low– to moderate–income communities located in a census tract
with an average median income at or below 80% of the average median income for the State;
(ii) overburdened or underserved communities, as defined in § 1–701
of the Environment Article; or
(iii) households with low to moderate income, as defined in § 9–2016
of this title.
(3) For fiscal year 2026 only, up to $100,000,000 of compliance fees paid
under §§ 7–705(b) and 7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of the Public Utilities Article shall be accounted for
separately within the Fund and may be used for solar development on State government
property and local government clean energy projects.
(4) (i) Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this paragraph,
compliance fees paid under § 7–705 of the Public Utilities Article may be used to provide
grants to electric companies to be refunded or credited to each residential distribution
customer based on the customer’s consumption of electricity supply that is subject to the
renewable energy portfolio standard.
(ii) The refunding or crediting of amounts to residential distribution
customers shall be identified on the customer’s bill as a line item identified as a “legislative
energy relief refund”.
(iii) An electric company awarded a grant under this paragraph:
1. may not retain any of the grant funds to cover overhead
expenses; and
2. shall provide all of the grant funds to residential
distribution customers.
(iv) The process under subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph
related to the refunding or crediting of amounts to residential distribution customers shall
be directed and overseen by the Commission.

HOUSE BILL 66
[(i–1)] (I) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Area median income” has the meaning stated in § 4–1801 of the
Housing and Community Development Article.
(iii) “Low and moderate income” means having an annual household
income that is at or below 120% of the area median income.
(2) Compliance fees paid under § 7–705(b–1) of the Public Utilities Article
shall be accounted for separately within the Fund and may be used only to make loans and
grants to promote increased opportunities for the growth and development of small,
minority, women–owned, and veteran–owned businesses in the State that install
geothermal systems in the State.
(j) (1) The Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same manner
as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any investment earnings of the Fund shall be paid into the Fund.
(3) Any repayment of principal and interest on loans made from the Fund
shall be paid into the Fund.
(4) Balances in the Fund shall be held for the benefit of the Program, shall
be expended solely for the purposes of the Program, and may not be used for the general
obligations of government.
(k) Expenditures from the Fund shall be made by:
(1) an appropriation in the annual State budget; or
(2) a budget amendment in accordance with § 7–209 of the State Finance
and Procurement Article.
(l) An expenditure by budget amendment may be made under subsection (k) of
this section only after:
(1) the Administration has submitted the proposed budget amendment and
supporting documentation to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, Senate
Education, Energy, and the Environment Committee, House Appropriations Committee,
and House Economic Matters Committee; and
(2) the committees have had 45 days for review and comment.

HOUSE BILL 66 11
(m) (1) A loan or grant made available from the Fund to a unit of State or local
government shall comply with §§ 14–416 and 17–303 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article.
(2) At least 80% of workers participating in a project or program that
receives money from the Fund must reside within 50 miles of the project or program, or
another distance defined by the local jurisdiction where the project or program is located.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 2–1002(h) through
(j) of Article – Environment of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be
Section(s) 2–1002(g) through (i), respectively.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Governor shall immediately begin the process of withdrawing the State
from participation in the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative.
(b) Within 30 days after receiving notice that the State is withdrawn from
participation in the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative, the Governor shall report to the
General Assembly in accordance with § 2–1002(g)(6) of the Environment Article.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Sections 1, 2, and 5 of this Act shall take effect contingent on:
(1) the State’s withdrawal from participation in the Regional Greenhouse
Gas Initiative; and
(2) the receipt by the General Assembly of the report required under §
2–1002(g)(6) of the Environment Article.
(b) Within 5 days after the report required under § 2–1002(g)(6) of the
Environment Article is received, the General Assembly shall notify the Department of
Legislative Services.
(c) If notice of the receipt of the report is received by the Department of
Legislative Services on or before June 1, 2031, Sections 1, 2, and 5 of this Act shall take
effect on the date the notice is received by the Department of Legislative Services in
accordance with subsection (b) of this section.
(d) If notice of the receipt of the report is not received by the Department of
Legislative Services on or before June 1, 2031, Sections 1, 2, and 5 of this Act, with no
further action required by the General Assembly, shall be null and void.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the

HOUSE BILL 66
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The
publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note following
the section affected.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 4 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2026.